Utah statutes.
77-6-5.   Appearance -- Procedure on default.

The defendant shall appear at the time appointed and answer the accusation, unless for some sufficient cause the court assigns another time for that purpose. If he does not appear, the court may proceed to hear and determine the accusation in his absence.

